Massachusetts, session 194th, H3347.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of Chapter 7C of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by adding the following new subsection:-
(h ½) The provisions of this section shall only apply to filed sub-bids procured under
section 44F of chapter 149 and trade contractor bids procured under section 8(a) of chapter
149A. For purposes of this section “applicable projects” shall mean any project procured by the
division of capital asset management and maintenance, the Massachusetts State College Building
Authority, the University of Massachusetts Building Authority, and the Massachusetts Port
Authority under sections 44A-J of chapter 149 or sections 1-12 of chapter 149A and any state
assisted building project with an overall estimated cost of $5,000.000 or more and the provisions
of 3

of this section shall apply only to such filed sub-bid or CM at Risk trade packages. On
applicable projects only, the awarding authority may establish minority owned business
enterprise and women owned business enterprise participation goals for any of the filed sub-bid
classes of work under section 44F of chapter 149 and for any of the trade contractor classes of
work under section 8(a) of chapter 149A. The total minority owned business enterprise and for
women owned business enterprise participation goal set by the awarding authority for a
particular class of work shall not exceed 10 percent of the value of the filed sub-bid or trade
contractor work. Notwithstanding any general law or contractual provision to the contrary, on
applicable projects filed sub-bidders and trade contractors in the classes of work listed in section
44F of chapter 149 and referenced in section 8 of chapter 149 respectively shall be permitted to
meet the minority owned business enterprise and women owned business enterprise
participation goals by subcontracting out portions of the trade contractor work which the sub-
bidder or trade contractor is otherwise required by law to perform with employees on its own
payroll and/or portions of the trade work which is customarily performed by sub-trade
subcontractors within the trade. Provided, the total value of the trade work which the filed sub-
bidder or trade contractor is required by law to self-perform which the filed sub-bidder or trade
contractor subcontracts out to meet the minority owned business enterprise and women owned
business enterprise participation goal shall not exceed such goal by more than an additional 10
percent of the value of the filed sub-bidder or trade contractor’s work The commissioner shall
establish a good faith pre bid and post bid/pre-award waiver process for filed sub-bidders and
trade contractors requesting a reduction or waiver of a participation goal.
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 44F, subsection (1) (a) of Chapter 149 of the Massachusetts
General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the third sentence in the first paragraph, the
following new sentence:-
Provided however, that a sub-bidder may subcontract out portions of its work in order to
meet MBE/WBE goals set on Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance,
Massachusetts State College Building Authority, University of Massachusetts Building
Authority, and Massachusetts Port Authority projects and on any state assisted project as set
forth in section 6(h1/2,) of chapter 7C.
SECTION 3. Section 8, subsection (g) (6) of Chapter 149A of the Massachusetts General
Laws is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new sentence:-
Provided however, that a trade contractor may subcontract out portions of its work in
order to meet MBE/WBE goals set on Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance,
Massachusetts State College Building Authority, University of Massachusetts Building
Authority, and Massachusetts Port Authority projects and on any state assisted project as set
forth in section 6(h1/2)of chapter 7C.
of 3